Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-906.07
Charitable organization; annual filing or reporting requirements.

(1) The Legislature finds that this section is necessary to minimize burdens on the charitable sector and encourage a grantmaking environment that is free and independent from intrusive or politically motivated regulation.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) Agency means each board, commission, department, officer, division, or other administrative office or unit of the state government authorized by law to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations, except the Adjutant General's office as provided in Chapter 55, the Legislature, the courts, including the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court, and the Commission of Industrial Relations; and

(b) Agency includes the Secretary of State and the Attorney General.

(3) Absent the showing of a compelling state interest or federal funding requirement, an agency shall not require any annual filing or reporting by a charitable organization, whether regulated or specifically exempted from regulation, that is more burdensome than any requirements authorized by state law. Any such filing or reporting requirement shall be narrowly tailored to achieve such compelling state interest.

(4) This section shall not be construed to limit or restrict the powers, duties, remedies, or penalties available to the Attorney General or Secretary of State under statute or common law, including, but not limited to, issuance of a civil investigative demand or subpoena.

Laws 2024, LB43, § 15.